Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning Contractors
198B.674.
Exemptions.

KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 shall not apply to:

Employees of any master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor who are subordinates of the licensee, if those employees are not journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanics or apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanics and do not engage in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting, except as an employee;

An employee of the United States government while practicing heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting on or within property owned by the United States government.

An individual owner of real property while practicing heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work on or within property owned and occupied by the individual;

A person employed in the installation, maintenance, repair, or replacement of residential window air conditioning units;

A person licensed under KRS Chapter 236, if he is installing, servicing, repairing, or replacing boiler devices;

A person licensed under KRS Chapter 322, if he is preparing plans or conducting construction inspections;

A full-time maintenance person or maintenance engineer performing routine maintenance of heating, ventilation, or air conditioning in connection with his employment;

Contractors or employees while installing or maintaining heating, cooling, air conditioning, ventilation, or burner services on any property or site owned or operated by any entity:

Subject to the jurisdiction of KRS Chapter 278; or

Of any municipal electric, water, gas, or sewer utility operating pursuant to any of the provisions of KRS Chapter 96;

The adjustment of an air flow device performed by any entity specified in subsection (8) of this section, if the adjustment is performed in conjunction with the installation, replacement, or repair of a gas distribution line;

A person licensed or certified pursuant to KRS 227.570, or the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, upon initial installation of air conditioning units incorporated with the original sale of a manufactured housing unit;

A general retailer whose primary business is not the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting, if that general retailer uses only licensed subcontractors that comply with the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689. The provisions of this subsection shall not exclude or limit the liability of the general retailer, or exempt the general retailer from the insurance requirements as established in KRS 198B.668, if the general retailer is engaging in the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting;

The installation, service, repair, or replacement of electrical units on any heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system;

An employee or agent of the Commonwealth of Kentucky while practicing heating and ventilation contracting in connection with weatherization assistance for low income persons pursuant to 903 KAR 6:020;

A person conducting routine maintenance of heating, ventilation, or air conditioning as a volunteer for any church or religious organization, provided he receives no compensation for the services rendered; or

The installation, service, repair, or replacement of liquefied petroleum gas units on any heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system by an employee of any person licensed under the provisions of KRS 234.120(1)(a).

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 79, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

198B.676.
Fees.

The department shall establish by administrative regulation and collect the following fees, not to exceed the cost of the licensing program:

Initial application fee for:

Master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor; and

Journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic;

Examination fee for:

Master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor;

Journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic; and

Apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic;

License renewal fee;

Certificate renewal fee;

Duplicate license or certificate fee;

Inactive status fee;

Restoration fee;

Reactivation fee; and

Change of information fee.

All fees and charges collected by the department under the provisions of this section shall be paid into a trust and agency account in the State Treasury. All expenses incurred by the department under the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 shall be paid out of this account, subject to approval of the department.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 169, § 57, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.678.
Responsibilities of master contractor working for company.

No firm, company, or corporation may engage in the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting in any county of the Commonwealth, unless the person in responsible charge of the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work is a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor and is an employee or subcontractor of the firm, company, or corporation.

Each master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor who is employed by a firm, company, or corporation engaged in the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting shall notify the department of that employment and upon termination of the employment.

No master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor shall represent more than one (1) firm, company, or corporation unless the contractor is domiciled in the Commonwealth and has a minimum of twenty-five percent (25%) ownership in each firm, company, or corporation the contractor represents.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 58, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

198B.680.
Inspector’s conflict of interest.

A person appointed or employed by the Commonwealth, a county, city, or other jurisdiction to administer, regulate, or inspect heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work shall not have any pecuniary interest in any heating, ventilation, and air conditioning business during the person’s employment with the government or other jurisdiction.

Upon the holder’s appointment or employment as an inspector, that person’s license or certificate shall become inactive. Upon termination of the appointment or employment as an inspector, the person’s license or certificate may be reactivated without examination, by written request to the department and payment of a reactivation fee.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 59, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.682.
Continuation of department’s jurisdiction — Notification to local officials of license sanctions.

The revocation, suspension, restriction, lapse, or voluntary surrender of a license or certificate issued by the department shall not deprive the department of jurisdiction to investigate allegations of wrongdoing under KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 or conduct disciplinary proceedings against a licensee or certificate holder.

The department shall, within thirty (30) days of the action, notify all appropriate local building officials, permit offices, or other authorized persons of license and certificate revocations, suspensions, probations, restrictions, and restorations.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 60, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.684.
Continuing education requirements.

The department may adopt by administrative regulation standards for continuing education for licensees and certificate holders.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 61, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.686.
Criminal penalties.

Effective July 1, 1995, any person for whom licensure or certification is required who is not licensed or certified by the department and practices heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting services shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Each violation shall be regarded as a separate offense.

Any person who advertises or otherwise holds himself out as being a licensed master or journeyman heating, ventilation, or air conditioning contractor and is not so licensed shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Each violation shall be regarded as a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 386, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 169, § 62, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.688.
Conformity with standards of the Uniform State Building Code.

The installation, maintenance, alteration, or repair of heating systems, ventilation systems, hydronic systems, burner service, or cooling systems governed by KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 shall be made in conformity with applicable standards of the Uniform State Building Code.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 20, effective July 15, 1994.

198B.689.
Citation of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 may be cited as the Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning Contractors’ Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 21, effective July 15, 1994.